Illinois, session 104th, SB1838.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Corporate Accountability for Tax 5Expenditures Act is amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 715/15)7    Sec. 15. Standardized applications for State development 8assistance.9    (a) All final applications submitted to the Department or 10any other State granting body requesting development 11assistance shall contain, at a minimum: 12        (1) An application tracking number that is specific to 13    both the State granting agency and to each application. 14        (2) The office mailing addresses, office telephone 15    number, and chief officer of the granting body. 16        (3) The office mailing address, telephone number, 17    4-digit SIC number or successor number, and the name of 18    the chief officer of the applicant or authorized designee 19    for the specific project site for which development 20    assistance is requested. 21        (4) The applicant's total number of employees at the 22    specific project site on the date that the application is 23    submitted to the State granting body, including the number   SB1838- 2 -LRB104 09230 HLH 19287 b1    of full-time, permanent jobs, the number of part-time 2    jobs, and the number of temporary jobs. 3        (5) The type of development assistance and value of 4    assistance being requested. 5        (6) The number of jobs to be created and retained or 6    both created and retained by the applicant as a result of 7    the development assistance, including the number of 8    full-time, permanent jobs, the number of part-time jobs, 9    and the number of temporary jobs. 10        (7) A detailed list of the occupation or job 11    classifications and number of new employees or retained 12    employees to be hired in full-time, permanent jobs, a 13    schedule of anticipated starting dates of the new hires 14    and the anticipated average wage by occupation or job 15    classification and total payroll to be created as a result 16    of the development assistance. 17        (8) A list of all other forms of development 18    assistance that the applicant is requesting for the 19    specific project site and the name of each State granting 20    body from which that development assistance is being 21    requested. 22        (9) A narrative, if necessary, describing why the 23    development assistance is needed and how the applicant's 24    use of the development assistance may reduce employment at 25    any site in Illinois. 26        (10) A certification by the chief officer of the   SB1838- 3 -LRB104 09230 HLH 19287 b1    applicant or his or her authorized designee that the 2    information contained in the application submitted to the 3    granting body contains no knowing misrepresentation of 4    material facts upon which eligibility for development 5    assistance is based.6    (b) Every State granting body either shall complete, or 7shall require the applicant to complete, an application form 8that meets the minimum requirements as prescribed in this 9Section each time an applicant applies for development 10assistance covered by this Act.11    (c) The Department shall have the discretion to modify any 12standardized application for State development assistance 13required under subsection (a) for any grants under the 14Industrial Training Program that are not given as an incentive 15to a recipient business organization.16    (d) If the applicant is seeking development assistance for 17a project that is a new office construction or office 18relocation that retains at least 100 jobs in the county in 19which the project is located or is being relocated to and the 20county has more than 25,000 residents but less than 50,000 21residents, the applicant shall be eligible for development 22assistance under the Department of Transportation's Economic 23Development Program. 24(Source: P.A. 93-552, eff. 8-20-03.)